Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 13.1 Groundwater Protection

46-13.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Groundwater Protection Act of 1985”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 494, § 1.

46-13.1-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby recognizes and declares that:

Water is vital to life and comprises an invaluable natural resource which is not to be abused by any segment of the state’s population or its economy. It is the policy of this state to restore, enhance, and maintain the chemical, physical, and biological integrity of its waters, to protect public health, to safeguard fish and aquatic life and scenic and ecological values, and to enhance the domestic, municipal, recreational, industrial, and other uses of water;

The groundwaters of this state are a critical renewable resource which must be protected to insure the availability of safe and potable drinking water for present and future needs;

It is a paramount policy of the state to protect the purity of present and future drinking water supplies by protecting aquifers, recharge areas, and watersheds;

It is the policy of the state to restore and maintain the quality of groundwater to a quality consistent with its use for drinking supplies and other designated beneficial uses without treatment as feasible. All groundwaters of the state shall be restored to the extent practicable to a quality consistent with this policy;

It is the policy of the state not to permit the introduction of pollutants into the groundwaters of the state in concentrations which are known to be toxic, carcinogenic, mutagenic, or teratogenic. To the maximum extent practical, efforts shall be made to require the removal of those pollutants from discharges where such discharges are shown to have already occurred;

Existing and potential sources of groundwater shall be maintained and protected. Where existing quality is inadequate to support certain uses, the quality shall be upgraded, if feasible, to protect the present and potential uses of the resource;

The groundwaters of the state are to be protected for use as agricultural, industrial, and potable water supplies, and other reasonable uses, and as a supplement to surface waters for recreation, wildlife, fish and other aquatic life, agriculture, industry, and potable water supply;

Discharges to groundwater which subsequently discharge into surface waters and which would cause a contravention of surface water quality or standards shall not be permitted.

No degradation of the state’s groundwaters shall be permitted unless the state chooses to allow lower water quality as a result of the essential, desirable, and justifiable economic, commercial, industrial, or social development.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 494, § 1.

46-13.1-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section, unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Aquifer” means a geologic formation, group of formations, or part of a formation capable of yielding a significant amount of groundwater to wells, springs, or surface water.

“Bedrock” means the solid rock, commonly called “ledge,” that forms the earth’s crust.

“Contaminant” means any physical, chemical, biological, or radiological substance or matter in water which impairs its intended or feasible use.

“Degradation” means a deterioration or a decline in ambient water quality.

“Director” means the director of the state department of environmental management.

“Groundwater” means water found underground which completely fills the open spaces between particles of sand, gravel, clay, silt, and consolidated rock fractures. The zone of materials filled with groundwater is called the “zone of saturation”.

“Groundwater recharge” means the processes of addition of water to the zone of saturation, that zone beneath the water table.

“Maximum contaminant level” means the maximum permissible level of a contaminant present in the water determined at a point of entry into the distribution system and at any point in the distribution system.

“Nondegradation” means maintenance of ambient water quality.

“Preventive action limit” means a specified percentage of a maximum contaminant level.

“Recharge area” means an area in which water is absorbed that eventually reaches the zone of saturation.

“Residence time” means the length of time a given unit volume of water (including any contaminant in that water) is present in a hydrologic system.

“Special protection area” means a designation which would delineate a recharge area within a groundwater reservoir which is particularly critical for the maintenance of large volumes of high quality groundwater for long periods of time.

“Toxic pollutant” means a water contaminant or combination of water contaminants in concentration(s) which, upon exposure, ingestion, or assimilation, either directly from the environment or indirectly through food chains, will unreasonably threaten to injure human health, or the health of animals or plants which are commonly hatched, bred, cultivated, or protected for use by persons for food or economic benefit.

“Water quality criteria” means a designated concentration of a constituent that, when not exceeded, will protect an organism, an organism community, or a prescribed water use or quality.

“Water table” means the upper surface of groundwater in the saturated zone of an aquifer system. The level of the water table fluctuates with varying rates of recharge and pumpage.

“Wellhead protection area” means the surface and subsurface area surrounding a public well or wellfield through which water will move toward and reach that well or wellfield.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 320, § 5.

46-13.1-4.
Groundwater classification.

For the purpose of protecting existing, proposed, or potential drinking water supplies, the director shall conduct a survey of all groundwater sources and related groundwater aquifers, watersheds, and deep flow recharge areas. Upon completion of the survey, the director shall designate the groundwater sources under one of the following classifications:

GAA — groundwater sources suitable for public drinking water use without treatment;

GA — groundwater sources which may be suitable for public or private drinking water without treatment;

GB — groundwater sources which may not be suitable for public or private drinking water without treatment due to known or presumed degradation;

GC — groundwater sources which may be suitable for certain waste disposal practices because past or present land use or hydrogeologic conditions render the groundwaters more suitable for receiving permitted discharges than for development as public or private water supply.

The director shall develop water quality standards for each classification which specify maximum contaminant levels for each classification. The approach for establishing the water quality standards shall include appropriate criteria established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency to protect the uses of groundwater as designated by the director. Water quality standards shall be used to promote restoration of groundwater to drinking water quality without treatment except where the groundwater is:

In a zone of discharge otherwise permitted by the provisions of the general laws;

Classified as GB and there exists no demonstrated present or future need to upgrade to GA; or

Classified as GC.

The director shall also develop a preventive action limit for each maximum contaminant level for each classification. In determining the percentage of the maximum contaminant level to be used as a preventive action limit for each contaminant, the director shall take into account whether the contaminant is a toxic pollutant and, if so, whether it has carcinogenic, mutagenic, or teratogenic properties or interactive effects. The director shall promulgate rules setting forth the range of responses that he or she may take, or that he or she may require the person, corporation, or other entity controlling a facility, activity, or practice that is a source of the contaminant to take, if the preventive action limit is attained or exceeded. The responses shall be designed to:

Minimize the concentration of the contaminant in the groundwater where technically and economically feasible;

Regain and maintain compliance with the preventive action limit, unless the director determines that the preventive action limit is either not technically or not economically feasible, in which case he or she shall achieve compliance with the lowest possible concentration that is technically and economically feasible; and

Ensure that the maximum contaminant level is not attained or exceeded.

The director shall complete duties assigned under this section on or before February 28, 1989.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 298, § 1.

46-13.1-5.
Groundwater protection study.

The department of environmental management is hereby authorized to conduct a statewide groundwater protection study to include:

A complete and updated hydrogeologic study depicting the quantities and qualities of groundwater that could be available to specific areas for private or public drinking water;

Present and projected demands for water for specific areas;

Recommendations for the utilization of the state’s groundwater resources, including integrated use with surface waters, for their greatest benefits;

Recommendations for such major engineering works or special districts which may be necessary, including the need, timing, and general cost thereof;

Recommendations for land use and other measures where appropriate. Pursuant to groundwater classifications as specified in §

46-13.1-4

, to insure the desired quality and abundance of water;

Consideration of the land and water resource needs of residential, recreational, agricultural, industrial, and commercial interests; and

Recommendations for regional and local planning and programs for water use and management of land resources interfacing with groundwater resources.

The director shall report the findings and recommendations of the groundwater protection study to the general assembly on or before February 28, 1988.

The department of environmental management is hereby directed to make recommendations to identify the physical location of significant aquifers and the identification of any actual or potential harms to those aquifers, and the development of a plan to protect the aquifers from the identifiable harms.

The director shall report the findings and recommendations of this portion of the groundwater protection study to the general assembly on or before February 28, 1987.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 298, § 1.

46-13.1-6.
Severability.

If the provisions of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, any invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 494, § 1.

46-13.1-7.
Repealed.

46-13.1-8.
Administration.

It shall be the duty of the director to administer this chapter in accordance with the specific findings, powers, and authority granted herein and in accordance with the full powers and authority of the director as provided in chapters 17.1 of title 42 and 12 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 632, § 1.

46-13.1-9.
Wellhead protection.

The director is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of a wellhead protection program for public water supply wells that has received approval from the federal Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to § 1428 of the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300h-7, and provided that the state shall be responsible for fulfilling program requirements with respect to the state lands located within wellhead protection areas designated as supplying public wells which are owned by the state. The wellhead protection program shall include, but not be limited to:

Identification of the rules and responsibilities of state agencies, local governments, and the suppliers of public water in the development and implementation of the state wellhead protection program;

Identification within each wellhead protection area of potential sources of contaminants that may have an adverse effect on the public health and the environment;

Management approaches at different levels of government and by the supplier to protect the groundwater within each wellhead protection area;

Contingency plans for the response to well or wellfield contamination and for the provision of alternate drinking water supplies;

A process of managing potential sources of contamination within the expected wellhead protection area of new public water supply wells;

Delineation of wellhead protection areas.

The director is authorized to require by regulation that municipalities and suppliers carry out action to implement subdivisions (3) through (5) in subsection (a) of this section. In the case of agricultural operations as defined in §

2-23-4

, the director will retain authority and responsibility for regulating, managing, and implementing approaches in wellhead protection areas.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 320, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 149, § 2.